Illinois, session 104th, HB2609.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 201 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/201)7    Sec. 201. Tax imposed. 8    (a) In general. A tax measured by net income is hereby 9imposed on every individual, corporation, trust and estate for 10each taxable year ending after July 31, 1969 on the privilege 11of earning or receiving income in or as a resident of this 12State. Such tax shall be in addition to all other occupation or 13privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 14corporation or political subdivision thereof.15    (b) Rates. The tax imposed by subsection (a) of this 16Section shall be determined as follows, except as adjusted by 17subsection (d-1):18        (1) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 19    taxable years ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount 20    equal to 2 1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the 21    taxable year.22        (2) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 23    taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending   HB2609- 2 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    after June 30, 1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 2 2    1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 3    July 1, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4    3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 5    30, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.6        (3) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 7    taxable years beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending 8    prior to January 1, 2011, an amount equal to 3% of the 9    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.10        (4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 11    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and 12    ending after December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum 13    of (i) 3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 14    to January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 15    (ii) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 16    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5.17        (5) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 18    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, 19    and ending prior to January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 5% 20    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.21        (5.1) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 22    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and 23    ending after December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum 24    of (i) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 25    to January 1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 26    (ii) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period   HB2609- 3 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    after December 31, 2014, as calculated under Section 2    202.5. 3        (5.2) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 4    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, 5    and ending prior to July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 3.75% 6    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 7        (5.3) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 8    for taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and 9    ending after June 30, 2017, an amount equal to the sum of 10    (i) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 11    prior to July 1, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, 12    and (ii) 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 13    after June 30, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 14        (5.4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 15    for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2017, an 16    amount equal to 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the 17    taxable year. 18        (6) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 19    ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount equal to 4% of the 20    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.21        (7) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 22    beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending after June 30, 23    1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4% of the 24    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 25    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4.8% of 26    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30,   HB2609- 4 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.2        (8) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 3    beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending prior to January 4    1, 2011, an amount equal to 4.8% of the taxpayer's net 5    income for the taxable year.6        (9) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 7    beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and ending after 8    December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4.8% 9    of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 10    January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 11    (ii) 7% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 12    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5. 13        (10) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 14    beginning on or after January 1, 2011, and ending prior to 15    January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 7% of the taxpayer's 16    net income for the taxable year. 17        (11) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 18    beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and ending after 19    December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 7% of 20    the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to January 21    1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 5.25% 22    of the taxpayer's net income for the period after December 23    31, 2014, as calculated under Section 202.5. 24        (12) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 25    beginning on or after January 1, 2015, and ending prior to 26    July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 5.25% of the taxpayer's   HB2609- 5 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    net income for the taxable year. 2        (13) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 3    beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and ending after June 30, 4    2017, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 5.25% of the 5    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 6    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 7% of 7    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30, 8    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 9        (14) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 10    beginning on or after July 1, 2017 and ending prior to 11    January 1, 2025, an amount equal to 7% of the taxpayer's 12    net income for the taxable year. 13        (15) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 14    beginning prior to January 1, 2025, and ending after 15    December 31, 2024, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 7% of 16    the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to January 17    1, 2025, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 5.5% 18    of the taxpayer's net income for the period after December 19    31, 2024, as calculated under Section 202.5.20        (16) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 21    beginning on or after January 1, 2025, an amount equal to 22    5.5% of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 23    The rates under this subsection (b) are subject to the 24provisions of Section 201.5. 25    (b-5) Surcharge; sale or exchange of assets, properties, 26and intangibles of organization gaming licensees. For each of   HB2609- 6 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1taxable years 2019 through 2027, a surcharge is imposed on all 2taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 3capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 4used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles (i) 5of an organization licensee under the Illinois Horse Racing 6Act of 1975 and (ii) of an organization gaming licensee under 7the Illinois Gambling Act. The amount of the surcharge is 8equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 9taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 10surcharge imposed shall not apply if: 11        (1) the organization gaming license, organization 12    license, or racetrack property is transferred as a result 13    of any of the following:14            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 15        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 16        licensee or the substantial owners of the initial 17        licensee;18            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 19        any such license by the Illinois Gaming Board or the 20        Illinois Racing Board;21            (C) a determination by the Illinois Gaming Board 22        that transfer of the license is in the best interests 23        of Illinois gaming;24            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 25        a licensee;26            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in   HB2609- 7 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 2        publicly traded company;3            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 4        owned subsidiary; or5            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 6        another person where both persons were initial owners 7        of the license when the license was issued; or 8        (2) the controlling interest in the organization 9    gaming license, organization license, or racetrack 10    property is transferred in a transaction to lineal 11    descendants in which no gain or loss is recognized or as a 12    result of a transaction in accordance with Section 351 of 13    the Internal Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is 14    recognized; or15        (3) live horse racing was not conducted in 2010 at a 16    racetrack located within 3 miles of the Mississippi River 17    under a license issued pursuant to the Illinois Horse 18    Racing Act of 1975. 19    The transfer of an organization gaming license, 20organization license, or racetrack property by a person other 21than the initial licensee to receive the organization gaming 22license is not subject to a surcharge. The Department shall 23adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this 24subsection. 25    (c) Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax. 26Beginning on July 1, 1979 and thereafter, in addition to such   HB2609- 8 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1income tax, there is also hereby imposed the Personal Property 2Tax Replacement Income Tax measured by net income on every 3corporation (including Subchapter S corporations), partnership 4and trust, for each taxable year ending after June 30, 1979. 5Such taxes are imposed on the privilege of earning or 6receiving income in or as a resident of this State. The 7Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax shall be in 8addition to the income tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 9of this Section and in addition to all other occupation or 10privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 11corporation or political subdivision thereof.12    (d) Additional Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 13Tax Rates. The personal property tax replacement income tax 14imposed by this subsection and subsection (c) of this Section 15in the case of a corporation, other than a Subchapter S 16corporation and except as adjusted by subsection (d-1), shall 17be an additional amount equal to 2.85% of such taxpayer's net 18income for the taxable year, except that beginning on January 191, 1981, and thereafter, the rate of 2.85% specified in this 20subsection shall be reduced to 2.5%, and in the case of a 21partnership, trust or a Subchapter S corporation shall be an 22additional amount equal to 1.5% of such taxpayer's net income 23for the taxable year.24    (d-1) Rate reduction for certain foreign insurers. In the 25case of a foreign insurer, as defined by Section 35A-5 of the 26Illinois Insurance Code, whose state or country of domicile   HB2609- 9 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1imposes on insurers domiciled in Illinois a retaliatory tax 2(excluding any insurer whose premiums from reinsurance assumed 3are 50% or more of its total insurance premiums as determined 4under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 304, except 5that for purposes of this determination premiums from 6reinsurance do not include premiums from inter-affiliate 7reinsurance arrangements), beginning with taxable years ending 8on or after December 31, 1999, the sum of the rates of tax 9imposed by subsections (b) and (d) shall be reduced (but not 10increased) to the rate at which the total amount of tax imposed 11under this Act, net of all credits allowed under this Act, 12shall equal (i) the total amount of tax that would be imposed 13on the foreign insurer's net income allocable to Illinois for 14the taxable year by such foreign insurer's state or country of 15domicile if that net income were subject to all income taxes 16and taxes measured by net income imposed by such foreign 17insurer's state or country of domicile, net of all credits 18allowed or (ii) a rate of zero if no such tax is imposed on 19such income by the foreign insurer's state of domicile. For 20the purposes of this subsection (d-1), an inter-affiliate 21includes a mutual insurer under common management.22        (1) For the purposes of subsection (d-1), in no event 23    shall the sum of the rates of tax imposed by subsections 24    (b) and (d) be reduced below the rate at which the sum of:25            (A) the total amount of tax imposed on such 26        foreign insurer under this Act for a taxable year, net   HB2609- 10 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        of all credits allowed under this Act, plus2            (B) the privilege tax imposed by Section 409 of 3        the Illinois Insurance Code, the fire insurance 4        company tax imposed by Section 12 of the Fire 5        Investigation Act, and the fire department taxes 6        imposed under Section 11-10-1 of the Illinois 7        Municipal Code,8    equals 1.25% for taxable years ending prior to December 9    31, 2003, or 1.75% for taxable years ending on or after 10    December 31, 2003, of the net taxable premiums written for 11    the taxable year, as described by subsection (1) of 12    Section 409 of the Illinois Insurance Code. This paragraph 13    will in no event increase the rates imposed under 14    subsections (b) and (d).15        (2) Any reduction in the rates of tax imposed by this 16    subsection shall be applied first against the rates 17    imposed by subsection (b) and only after the tax imposed 18    by subsection (a) net of all credits allowed under this 19    Section other than the credit allowed under subsection (i) 20    has been reduced to zero, against the rates imposed by 21    subsection (d).22    This subsection (d-1) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 250.24    (e) Investment credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a 25credit against the Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 26Tax for investment in qualified property.  HB2609- 11 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit equal to .5% 2    of the basis of qualified property placed in service 3    during the taxable year, provided such property is placed 4    in service on or after July 1, 1984. There shall be allowed 5    an additional credit equal to .5% of the basis of 6    qualified property placed in service during the taxable 7    year, provided such property is placed in service on or 8    after July 1, 1986, and the taxpayer's base employment 9    within Illinois has increased by 1% or more over the 10    preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's employment 11    records filed with the Illinois Department of Employment 12    Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois shall be 13    deemed to have met the 1% growth in base employment for the 14    first year in which they file employment records with the 15    Illinois Department of Employment Security. The provisions 16    added to this Section by Public Act 85-1200 (and restored 17    by Public Act 87-895) shall be construed as declaratory of 18    existing law and not as a new enactment. If, in any year, 19    the increase in base employment within Illinois over the 20    preceding year is less than 1%, the additional credit 21    shall be limited to that percentage times a fraction, the 22    numerator of which is .5% and the denominator of which is 23    1%, but shall not exceed .5%. The investment credit shall 24    not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 25    taxpayer's liability in any tax year below zero, nor may 26    any credit for qualified property be allowed for any year   HB2609- 12 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    other than the year in which the property was placed in 2    service in Illinois. For tax years ending on or after 3    December 31, 1987, and on or before December 31, 1988, the 4    credit shall be allowed for the tax year in which the 5    property is placed in service, or, if the amount of the 6    credit exceeds the tax liability for that year, whether it 7    exceeds the original liability or the liability as later 8    amended, such excess may be carried forward and applied to 9    the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the 10    excess credit years if the taxpayer (i) makes investments 11    which cause the creation of a minimum of 2,000 full-time 12    equivalent jobs in Illinois, (ii) is located in an 13    enterprise zone established pursuant to the Illinois 14    Enterprise Zone Act and (iii) is certified by the 15    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 16    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity) as 17    complying with the requirements specified in clause (i) 18    and (ii) by July 1, 1986. The Department of Commerce and 19    Community Affairs (now Department of Commerce and Economic 20    Opportunity) shall notify the Department of Revenue of all 21    such certifications immediately. For tax years ending 22    after December 31, 1988, the credit shall be allowed for 23    the tax year in which the property is placed in service, 24    or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 25    for that year, whether it exceeds the original liability 26    or the liability as later amended, such excess may be   HB2609- 13 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 2    taxable years following the excess credit years. The 3    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 4    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 5    tax year that is available to offset a liability, earlier 6    credit shall be applied first.7        (2) The term "qualified property" means property 8    which:9            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 10        buildings and structural components of buildings and 11        signs that are real property, but not including land 12        or improvements to real property that are not a 13        structural component of a building such as 14        landscaping, sewer lines, local access roads, fencing, 15        parking lots, and other appurtenances;16            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 17        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 18        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 19        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 20        (e);21            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 22        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;23            (D) is used in Illinois by a taxpayer who is 24        primarily engaged in manufacturing, or in mining coal 25        or fluorite, or in retailing, or was placed in service 26        on or after July 1, 2006 in a River Edge Redevelopment   HB2609- 14 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 2        Redevelopment Zone Act; and3            (E) has not previously been used in Illinois in 4        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 5        the credit provided by this subsection (e) or 6        subsection (f).7        (3) For purposes of this subsection (e), 8    "manufacturing" means the material staging and production 9    of tangible personal property by procedures commonly 10    regarded as manufacturing, processing, fabrication, or 11    assembling which changes some existing material into new 12    shapes, new qualities, or new combinations. For purposes 13    of this subsection (e) the term "mining" shall have the 14    same meaning as the term "mining" in Section 613(c) of the 15    Internal Revenue Code. For purposes of this subsection 16    (e), the term "retailing" means the sale of tangible 17    personal property for use or consumption and not for 18    resale, or services rendered in conjunction with the sale 19    of tangible personal property for use or consumption and 20    not for resale. For purposes of this subsection (e), 21    "tangible personal property" has the same meaning as when 22    that term is used in the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 23    and, for taxable years ending after December 31, 2008, 24    does not include the generation, transmission, or 25    distribution of electricity.26        (4) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis   HB2609- 15 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 2    income tax purposes.3        (5) If the basis of the property for federal income 4    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 5    placed in service in Illinois by the taxpayer, the amount 6    of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 7    service on the date of such increase in basis.8        (6) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 9    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.10        (7) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to 11    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within 12    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 13    any qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 14    months after being placed in service, the Personal 15    Property Tax Replacement Income Tax for such taxable year 16    shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined by 17    (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 18    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 19    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 20    property from such computation and, (ii) subtracting such 21    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 22    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (7), a 23    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 24    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 25    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 26    of such reduction.  HB2609- 16 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        (8) Unless the investment credit is extended by law, 2    the basis of qualified property shall not include costs 3    incurred after December 31, 2018, except for costs 4    incurred pursuant to a binding contract entered into on or 5    before December 31, 2018.6        (9) Each taxable year ending before December 31, 2000, 7    a partnership may elect to pass through to its partners 8    the credits to which the partnership is entitled under 9    this subsection (e) for the taxable year. A partner may 10    use the credit allocated to him or her under this 11    paragraph only against the tax imposed in subsections (c) 12    and (d) of this Section. If the partnership makes that 13    election, those credits shall be allocated among the 14    partners in the partnership in accordance with the rules 15    set forth in Section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 16    and the rules promulgated under that Section, and the 17    allocated amount of the credits shall be allowed to the 18    partners for that taxable year. The partnership shall make 19    this election on its Personal Property Tax Replacement 20    Income Tax return for that taxable year. The election to 21    pass through the credits shall be irrevocable.22        For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 23    2000, a partner that qualifies its partnership for a 24    subtraction under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of 25    subsection (d) of Section 203 or a shareholder that 26    qualifies a Subchapter S corporation for a subtraction   HB2609- 17 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    under subparagraph (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) 2    of Section 203 shall be allowed a credit under this 3    subsection (e) equal to its share of the credit earned 4    under this subsection (e) during the taxable year by the 5    partnership or Subchapter S corporation, determined in 6    accordance with the determination of income and 7    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 8    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. This 9    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 250.10    (f) Investment credit; Enterprise Zone; River Edge 11Redevelopment Zone.12        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the 13    tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 14    investment in qualified property which is placed in 15    service in an Enterprise Zone created pursuant to the 16    Illinois Enterprise Zone Act or, for property placed in 17    service on or after July 1, 2006, a River Edge 18    Redevelopment Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 19    Redevelopment Zone Act. For partners, shareholders of 20    Subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 21    companies, if the liability company is treated as a 22    partnership for purposes of federal and State income 23    taxation, for taxable years ending before December 31, 24    2023, there shall be allowed a credit under this 25    subsection (f) to be determined in accordance with the 26    determination of income and distributive share of income   HB2609- 18 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    under Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the 2    Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years ending on or 3    after December 31, 2023, for partners and shareholders of 4    Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of Section 251 5    shall apply with respect to the credit under this 6    subsection. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such 7    property. The credit shall be available only in the 8    taxable year in which the property is placed in service in 9    the Enterprise Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone and 10    shall not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 11    taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by subsections 12    (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For tax years 13    ending on or after December 31, 1985, the credit shall be 14    allowed for the tax year in which the property is placed in 15    service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax 16    liability for that year, whether it exceeds the original 17    liability or the liability as later amended, such excess 18    may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of 19    the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The 20    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 21    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 22    tax year that is available to offset a liability, the 23    credit accruing first in time shall be applied first.24        (2) The term qualified property means property which:25            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 26        buildings and structural components of buildings;  HB2609- 19 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 3        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 4        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 5        (f);6            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 7        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;8            (D) is used in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 9        Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer; and10            (E) has not been previously used in Illinois in 11        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 12        the credit provided by this subsection (f) or 13        subsection (e).14        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 15    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 16    income tax purposes.17        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 18    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 19    placed in service in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 20    Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer, the amount of such 21    increase shall be deemed property placed in service on the 22    date of such increase in basis.23        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 24    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.25        (6) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to 26    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within   HB2609- 20 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 2    any qualified property is moved outside the Enterprise 3    Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone within 48 months 4    after being placed in service, the tax imposed under 5    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such taxable 6    year shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined 7    by (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 8    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 9    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 10    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 11    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 12    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 13    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 14    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 15    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 16    of such reduction.17        (7) There shall be allowed an additional credit equal 18    to 0.5% of the basis of qualified property placed in 19    service during the taxable year in a River Edge 20    Redevelopment Zone, provided such property is placed in 21    service on or after July 1, 2006, and the taxpayer's base 22    employment within Illinois has increased by 1% or more 23    over the preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's 24    employment records filed with the Illinois Department of 25    Employment Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois 26    shall be deemed to have met the 1% growth in base   HB2609- 21 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    employment for the first year in which they file 2    employment records with the Illinois Department of 3    Employment Security. If, in any year, the increase in base 4    employment within Illinois over the preceding year is less 5    than 1%, the additional credit shall be limited to that 6    percentage times a fraction, the numerator of which is 7    0.5% and the denominator of which is 1%, but shall not 8    exceed 0.5%. 9        (8) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 10    2021, there shall be allowed an Enterprise Zone 11    construction jobs credit against the taxes imposed under 12    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section as provided in 13    Section 13 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 14        The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 15    liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 16    credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may 17    be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's 18    liability in succeeding calendar years in the same manner 19    provided under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. 20    The credit or credits shall be applied to the earliest 21    year for which there is a tax liability. If there are 22    credits from more than one taxable year that are available 23    to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied 24    first. 25        For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S 26    corporations, and owners of limited liability companies,   HB2609- 22 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    if the liability company is treated as a partnership for 2    the purposes of federal and State income taxation, for 3    taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 4    be allowed a credit under this Section to be determined in 5    accordance with the determination of income and 6    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 7    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable 8    years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners 9    and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 10    provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 11    credit under this subsection.12        The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under 13    the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) 14    shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 15        This paragraph (8) is exempt from the provisions of 16    Section 250. 17    (g) (Blank).18    (h) Investment credit; High Impact Business.19        (1) Subject to subsections (b) and (b-5) of Section 20    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, a taxpayer shall 21    be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 22    (a) and (b) of this Section for investment in qualified 23    property which is placed in service by a Department of 24    Commerce and Economic Opportunity designated High Impact 25    Business. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such 26    property. The credit shall not be available (i) until the   HB2609- 23 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    minimum investments in qualified property set forth in 2    subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois 3    Enterprise Zone Act have been satisfied or (ii) until the 4    time authorized in subsection (b-5) of the Illinois 5    Enterprise Zone Act for entities designated as High Impact 6    Businesses under subdivisions (a)(3)(B), (a)(3)(C), and 7    (a)(3)(D) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 8    Act, and shall not be allowed to the extent that it would 9    reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 10    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. The 11    credit applicable to such investments shall be taken in 12    the taxable year in which such investments have been 13    completed. The credit for additional investments beyond 14    the minimum investment by a designated high impact 15    business authorized under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 16    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act shall be available 17    only in the taxable year in which the property is placed in 18    service and shall not be allowed to the extent that it 19    would reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 20    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For 21    tax years ending on or after December 31, 1987, the credit 22    shall be allowed for the tax year in which the property is 23    placed in service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds 24    the tax liability for that year, whether it exceeds the 25    original liability or the liability as later amended, such 26    excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax   HB2609- 24 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 2    credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest 3    year for which there is a liability. If there is credit 4    from more than one tax year that is available to offset a 5    liability, the credit accruing first in time shall be 6    applied first.7        Changes made in this subdivision (h)(1) by Public Act 8    88-670 restore changes made by Public Act 85-1182 and 9    reflect existing law.10        (2) The term qualified property means property which:11            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 12        buildings and structural components of buildings;13            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 14        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 15        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 16        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 17        (h);18            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 19        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code; and20            (D) is not eligible for the Enterprise Zone 21        Investment Credit provided by subsection (f) of this 22        Section.23        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 24    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 25    income tax purposes.26        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income   HB2609- 25 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 2    placed in service in a federally designated Foreign Trade 3    Zone or Sub-Zone located in Illinois by the taxpayer, the 4    amount of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 5    service on the date of such increase in basis.6        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 7    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.8        (6) If during any taxable year ending on or before 9    December 31, 1996, any property ceases to be qualified 10    property in the hands of the taxpayer within 48 months 11    after being placed in service, or the situs of any 12    qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 13    months after being placed in service, the tax imposed 14    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such 15    taxable year shall be increased. Such increase shall be 16    determined by (i) recomputing the investment credit which 17    would have been allowed for the year in which credit for 18    such property was originally allowed by eliminating such 19    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 20    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 21    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 22    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 23    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 24    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 25    of such reduction.26        (7) Beginning with tax years ending after December 31,   HB2609- 26 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    1996, if a taxpayer qualifies for the credit under this 2    subsection (h) and thereby is granted a tax abatement and 3    the taxpayer relocates its entire facility in violation of 4    the explicit terms and length of the contract under 5    Section 18-183 of the Property Tax Code, the tax imposed 6    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be 7    increased for the taxable year in which the taxpayer 8    relocated its facility by an amount equal to the amount of 9    credit received by the taxpayer under this subsection (h).10    (h-5) High Impact Business construction jobs credit. For 11taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, there 12shall also be allowed a High Impact Business construction jobs 13credit against the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 14of this Section as provided in subsections (i) and (j) of 15Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 16    The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 17liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 18credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may be 19carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability 20in succeeding calendar years in the manner provided under 21paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or credits 22shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 23liability. If there are credits from more than one taxable 24year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 25credit shall be applied first. 26    For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations,   HB2609- 27 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1and owners of limited liability companies, for taxable years 2ending before December 31, 2023, if the liability company is 3treated as a partnership for the purposes of federal and State 4income taxation, there shall be allowed a credit under this 5Section to be determined in accordance with the determination 6of income and distributive share of income under Sections 702 7and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For 8taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for 9partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 10provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 11credit under this subsection.12    The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under the 13Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) shall not 14exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 15    This subsection (h-5) is exempt from the provisions of 16Section 250. 17    (i) Credit for Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 18Tax. For tax years ending prior to December 31, 2003, a credit 19shall be allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 20and (b) of this Section for the tax imposed by subsections (c) 21and (d) of this Section. This credit shall be computed by 22multiplying the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 23Section by a fraction, the numerator of which is base income 24allocable to Illinois and the denominator of which is Illinois 25base income, and further multiplying the product by the tax 26rate imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.  HB2609- 28 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    Any credit earned on or after December 31, 1986 under this 2subsection which is unused in the year the credit is computed 3because it exceeds the tax liability imposed by subsections 4(a) and (b) for that year (whether it exceeds the original 5liability or the liability as later amended) may be carried 6forward and applied to the tax liability imposed by 7subsections (a) and (b) of the 5 taxable years following the 8excess credit year, provided that no credit may be carried 9forward to any year ending on or after December 31, 2003. This 10credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for which 11there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 12subsection from more than one tax year that is available to 13offset a liability the earliest credit arising under this 14subsection shall be applied first.15    If, during any taxable year ending on or after December 1631, 1986, the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 17Section for which a taxpayer has claimed a credit under this 18subsection (i) is reduced, the amount of credit for such tax 19shall also be reduced. Such reduction shall be determined by 20recomputing the credit to take into account the reduced tax 21imposed by subsections (c) and (d). If any portion of the 22reduced amount of credit has been carried to a different 23taxable year, an amended return shall be filed for such 24taxable year to reduce the amount of credit claimed.25    (j) Training expense credit. Beginning with tax years 26ending on or after December 31, 1986 and prior to December 31,   HB2609- 29 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b12003, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 2imposed by subsections (a) and (b) under this Section for all 3amounts paid or accrued, on behalf of all persons employed by 4the taxpayer in Illinois or Illinois residents employed 5outside of Illinois by a taxpayer, for educational or 6vocational training in semi-technical or technical fields or 7semi-skilled or skilled fields, which were deducted from gross 8income in the computation of taxable income. The credit 9against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) shall be 101.6% of such training expenses. For partners, shareholders of 11subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 12companies, if the liability company is treated as a 13partnership for purposes of federal and State income taxation, 14for taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 15be allowed a credit under this subsection (j) to be determined 16in accordance with the determination of income and 17distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 and 18subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years 19ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners and 20shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of 21Section 251 shall apply with respect to the credit under this 22subsection.23    Any credit allowed under this subsection which is unused 24in the year the credit is earned may be carried forward to each 25of the 5 taxable years following the year for which the credit 26is first computed until it is used. This credit shall be   HB2609- 30 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1applied first to the earliest year for which there is a 2liability. If there is a credit under this subsection from 3more than one tax year that is available to offset a liability, 4the earliest credit arising under this subsection shall be 5applied first. No carryforward credit may be claimed in any 6tax year ending on or after December 31, 2003.7    (k) Research and development credit. For tax years ending 8after July 1, 1990 and prior to December 31, 2003, and 9beginning again for tax years ending on or after December 31, 102004, and ending prior to January 1, 2032, a taxpayer shall be 11allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 12and (b) of this Section for increasing research activities in 13this State. The credit allowed against the tax imposed by 14subsections (a) and (b) shall be equal to 6 1/2% of the 15qualifying expenditures for increasing research activities in 16this State. For partners, shareholders of subchapter S 17corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, if 18the liability company is treated as a partnership for purposes 19of federal and State income taxation, for taxable years ending 20before December 31, 2023, there shall be allowed a credit 21under this subsection to be determined in accordance with the 22determination of income and distributive share of income under 23Sections 702 and 704 and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue 24Code. For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, 25for partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, 26the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the   HB2609- 31 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1credit under this subsection.2    For purposes of this subsection, "qualifying expenditures" 3means the qualifying expenditures as defined for the federal 4credit for increasing research activities which would be 5allowable under Section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code and 6which are conducted in this State, "qualifying expenditures 7for increasing research activities in this State" means the 8excess of qualifying expenditures for the taxable year in 9which incurred over qualifying expenditures for the base 10period, "qualifying expenditures for the base period" means 11the average of the qualifying expenditures for each year in 12the base period, and "base period" means the 3 taxable years 13immediately preceding the taxable year for which the 14determination is being made.15    Any credit in excess of the tax liability for the taxable 16year may be carried forward. A taxpayer may elect to have the 17unused credit shown on its final completed return carried over 18as a credit against the tax liability for the following 5 19taxable years or until it has been fully used, whichever 20occurs first; provided that no credit earned in a tax year 21ending prior to December 31, 2003 may be carried forward to any 22year ending on or after December 31, 2003.23    If an unused credit is carried forward to a given year from 242 or more earlier years, that credit arising in the earliest 25year will be applied first against the tax liability for the 26given year. If a tax liability for the given year still   HB2609- 32 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1remains, the credit from the next earliest year will then be 2applied, and so on, until all credits have been used or no tax 3liability for the given year remains. Any remaining unused 4credit or credits then will be carried forward to the next 5following year in which a tax liability is incurred, except 6that no credit can be carried forward to a year which is more 7than 5 years after the year in which the expense for which the 8credit is given was incurred.9    No inference shall be drawn from Public Act 91-644 in 10construing this Section for taxable years beginning before 11January 1, 1999.12    It is the intent of the General Assembly that the research 13and development credit under this subsection (k) shall apply 14continuously for all tax years ending on or after December 31, 152004 and ending prior to January 1, 2032, including, but not 16limited to, the period beginning on January 1, 2016 and ending 17on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 100-22). All 18actions taken in reliance on the continuation of the credit 19under this subsection (k) by any taxpayer are hereby 20validated. 21    (l) Environmental Remediation Tax Credit.22        (i) For tax years ending after December 31, 1997 and 23    on or before December 31, 2001, a taxpayer shall be 24    allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 25    (a) and (b) of this Section for certain amounts paid for 26    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs, as specified in   HB2609- 33 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    this subsection. For purposes of this Section, 2    "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" means costs 3    approved by the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 4    ("Agency") under Section 58.14 of the Environmental 5    Protection Act that were paid in performing environmental 6    remediation at a site for which a No Further Remediation 7    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 8    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 9    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval 10    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 11    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 12    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 13    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 14    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 15    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 16    of the Environmental Protection Act. After the Pollution 17    Control Board rules are adopted pursuant to the Illinois 18    Administrative Procedure Act for the administration and 19    enforcement of Section 58.9 of the Environmental 20    Protection Act, determinations as to credit availability 21    for purposes of this Section shall be made consistent with 22    those rules. For purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" 23    includes a person whose tax attributes the taxpayer has 24    succeeded to under Section 381 of the Internal Revenue 25    Code and "related party" includes the persons disallowed a 26    deduction for losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of   HB2609- 34 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    Section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of 2    being a related taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. 3    The credit allowed against the tax imposed by subsections 4    (a) and (b) shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed 5    eligible remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site, 6    except that the $100,000 threshold shall not apply to any 7    site contained in an enterprise zone as determined by the 8    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 9    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity). The 10    total credit allowed shall not exceed $40,000 per year 11    with a maximum total of $150,000 per site. For partners 12    and shareholders of subchapter S corporations, there shall 13    be allowed a credit under this subsection to be determined 14    in accordance with the determination of income and 15    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 16    and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code.17        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 18    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 19    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 20    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. The 21    term "unused credit" does not include any amounts of 22    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs in excess of the 23    maximum credit per site authorized under paragraph (i). 24    This credit shall be applied first to the earliest year 25    for which there is a liability. If there is a credit under 26    this subsection from more than one tax year that is   HB2609- 35 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    available to offset a liability, the earliest credit 2    arising under this subsection shall be applied first. A 3    credit allowed under this subsection may be sold to a 4    buyer as part of a sale of all or part of the remediation 5    site for which the credit was granted. The purchaser of a 6    remediation site and the tax credit shall succeed to the 7    unused credit and remaining carry-forward period of the 8    seller. To perfect the transfer, the assignor shall record 9    the transfer in the chain of title for the site and provide 10    written notice to the Director of the Illinois Department 11    of Revenue of the assignor's intent to sell the 12    remediation site and the amount of the tax credit to be 13    transferred as a portion of the sale. In no event may a 14    credit be transferred to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or a 15    related party would not be eligible under the provisions 16    of subsection (i).17        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 18    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 19    Environmental Protection Act.20    (m) Education expense credit. Beginning with tax years 21ending after December 31, 1999, a taxpayer who is the 22custodian of one or more qualifying pupils shall be allowed a 23credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 24this Section for qualified education expenses incurred on 25behalf of the qualifying pupils. The credit shall be equal to 2625% of qualified education expenses, but in no event may the   HB2609- 36 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1total credit under this subsection claimed by a family that is 2the custodian of qualifying pupils exceed (i) $500 for tax 3years ending prior to December 31, 2017, and (ii) $750 for tax 4years ending on or after December 31, 2017. In no event shall a 5credit under this subsection reduce the taxpayer's liability 6under this Act to less than zero. Notwithstanding any other 7provision of law, for taxable years beginning on or after 8January 1, 2017, no taxpayer may claim a credit under this 9subsection (m) if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the 10taxable year exceeds (i) $500,000, in the case of spouses 11filing a joint federal tax return or (ii) $250,000, in the case 12of all other taxpayers. This subsection is exempt from the 13provisions of Section 250 of this Act.14    For purposes of this subsection:15    "Qualifying pupils" means individuals who (i) are 16residents of the State of Illinois, (ii) are under the age of 1721 at the close of the school year for which a credit is 18sought, and (iii) during the school year for which a credit is 19sought were full-time pupils enrolled in a kindergarten 20through twelfth grade education program at any school, as 21defined in this subsection.22    "Qualified education expense" means the amount incurred on 23behalf of a qualifying pupil in excess of $250 for tuition, 24book fees, and lab fees at the school in which the pupil is 25enrolled during the regular school year.26    "School" means any public or nonpublic elementary or   HB2609- 37 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1secondary school in Illinois that is in compliance with Title 2VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and attendance at which 3satisfies the requirements of Section 26-1 of the School Code, 4except that nothing shall be construed to require a child to 5attend any particular public or nonpublic school to qualify 6for the credit under this Section.7    "Custodian" means, with respect to qualifying pupils, an 8Illinois resident who is a parent, the parents, a legal 9guardian, or the legal guardians of the qualifying pupils.10    (n) River Edge Redevelopment Zone site remediation tax 11credit. 12        (i) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 13    2006, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 14    imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 15    certain amounts paid for unreimbursed eligible remediation 16    costs, as specified in this subsection. For purposes of 17    this Section, "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" 18    means costs approved by the Illinois Environmental 19    Protection Agency ("Agency") under Section 58.14a of the 20    Environmental Protection Act that were paid in performing 21    environmental remediation at a site within a River Edge 22    Redevelopment Zone for which a No Further Remediation 23    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 24    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 25    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval 26    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit   HB2609- 38 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 2    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 3    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 4    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 5    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 6    of the Environmental Protection Act. Determinations as to 7    credit availability for purposes of this Section shall be 8    made consistent with rules adopted by the Pollution 9    Control Board pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 10    Procedure Act for the administration and enforcement of 11    Section 58.9 of the Environmental Protection Act. For 12    purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" includes a person 13    whose tax attributes the taxpayer has succeeded to under 14    Section 381 of the Internal Revenue Code and "related 15    party" includes the persons disallowed a deduction for 16    losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of Section 267 17    of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of being a related 18    taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. The credit 19    allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 20    shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed eligible 21    remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site.22        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 23    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 24    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 25    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. This 26    credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for   HB2609- 39 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    which there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 2    subsection from more than one tax year that is available 3    to offset a liability, the earliest credit arising under 4    this subsection shall be applied first. A credit allowed 5    under this subsection may be sold to a buyer as part of a 6    sale of all or part of the remediation site for which the 7    credit was granted. The purchaser of a remediation site 8    and the tax credit shall succeed to the unused credit and 9    remaining carry-forward period of the seller. To perfect 10    the transfer, the assignor shall record the transfer in 11    the chain of title for the site and provide written notice 12    to the Director of the Illinois Department of Revenue of 13    the assignor's intent to sell the remediation site and the 14    amount of the tax credit to be transferred as a portion of 15    the sale. In no event may a credit be transferred to any 16    taxpayer if the taxpayer or a related party would not be 17    eligible under the provisions of subsection (i).18        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 19    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 20    Environmental Protection Act.21    (o) For each of taxable years during the Compassionate Use 22of Medical Cannabis Program, a surcharge is imposed on all 23taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 24capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 25used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles of 26an organization registrant under the Compassionate Use of   HB2609- 40 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1Medical Cannabis Program Act. The amount of the surcharge is 2equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 3taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 4surcharge imposed does not apply if:5        (1) the medical cannabis cultivation center 6    registration, medical cannabis dispensary registration, or 7    the property of a registration is transferred as a result 8    of any of the following:9            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 10        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 11        registration or the substantial owners of the initial 12        registration;13            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 14        any registration by the Illinois Department of Public 15        Health;16            (C) a determination by the Illinois Department of 17        Public Health that transfer of the registration is in 18        the best interests of Illinois qualifying patients as 19        defined by the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 20        Program Act;21            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 22        a registrant;23            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 24        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 25        publicly traded company;26            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly   HB2609- 41 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        owned subsidiary; or2            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 3        another person where both persons were initial owners 4        of the registration when the registration was issued; 5        or6        (2) the cannabis cultivation center registration, 7    medical cannabis dispensary registration, or the 8    controlling interest in a registrant's property is 9    transferred in a transaction to lineal descendants in 10    which no gain or loss is recognized or as a result of a 11    transaction in accordance with Section 351 of the Internal 12    Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is recognized.13    (p) Pass-through entity tax. 14        (1) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 15    2021 and beginning prior to January 1, 2026, a partnership 16    (other than a publicly traded partnership under Section 17    7704 of the Internal Revenue Code) or Subchapter S 18    corporation may elect to apply the provisions of this 19    subsection. A separate election shall be made for each 20    taxable year. Such election shall be made at such time, 21    and in such form and manner as prescribed by the 22    Department, and, once made, is irrevocable. 23        (2) Entity-level tax. A partnership or Subchapter S 24    corporation electing to apply the provisions of this 25    subsection shall be subject to a tax for the privilege of 26    earning or receiving income in this State in an amount   HB2609- 42 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    equal to 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the 2    taxable year. 3        (3) Net income defined. 4            (A) In general. For purposes of paragraph (2), the 5        term net income has the same meaning as defined in 6        Section 202 of this Act, except that, for tax years 7        ending on or after December 31, 2023, a deduction 8        shall be allowed in computing base income for 9        distributions to a retired partner to the extent that 10        the partner's distributions are exempt from tax under 11        Section 203(a)(2)(F) of this Act. In addition, the 12        following modifications shall not apply: 13                (i) the standard exemption allowed under 14            Section 204; 15                (ii) the deduction for net losses allowed 16            under Section 207; 17                (iii) in the case of an S corporation, the 18            modification under Section 203(b)(2)(S); and 19                (iv) in the case of a partnership, the 20            modifications under Section 203(d)(2)(H) and 21            Section 203(d)(2)(I). 22            (B) Special rule for tiered partnerships. If a 23        taxpayer making the election under paragraph (1) is a 24        partner of another taxpayer making the election under 25        paragraph (1), net income shall be computed as 26        provided in subparagraph (A), except that the taxpayer   HB2609- 43 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1        shall subtract its distributive share of the net 2        income of the electing partnership (including its 3        distributive share of the net income of the electing 4        partnership derived as a distributive share from 5        electing partnerships in which it is a partner). 6        (4) Credit for entity level tax. Each partner or 7    shareholder of a taxpayer making the election under this 8    Section shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 9    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 10    for the taxable year of the partnership or Subchapter S 11    corporation for which an election is in effect ending 12    within or with the taxable year of the partner or 13    shareholder in an amount equal to 4.95% times the partner 14    or shareholder's distributive share of the net income of 15    the electing partnership or Subchapter S corporation, but 16    not to exceed the partner's or shareholder's share of the 17    tax imposed under paragraph (1) which is actually paid by 18    the partnership or Subchapter S corporation. If the 19    taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S corporation that 20    is itself a partner of a partnership making the election 21    under paragraph (1), the credit under this paragraph shall 22    be allowed to the taxpayer's partners or shareholders (or 23    if the partner is a partnership or Subchapter S 24    corporation then its partners or shareholders) in 25    accordance with the determination of income and 26    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704   HB2609- 44 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. If the 2    amount of the credit allowed under this paragraph exceeds 3    the partner's or shareholder's liability for tax imposed 4    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 5    for the taxable year, such excess shall be treated as an 6    overpayment for purposes of Section 909 of this Act. 7        (5) Nonresidents. A nonresident individual who is a 8    partner or shareholder of a partnership or Subchapter S 9    corporation for a taxable year for which an election is in 10    effect under paragraph (1) shall not be required to file 11    an income tax return under this Act for such taxable year 12    if the only source of net income of the individual (or the 13    individual and the individual's spouse in the case of a 14    joint return) is from an entity making the election under 15    paragraph (1) and the credit allowed to the partner or 16    shareholder under paragraph (4) equals or exceeds the 17    individual's liability for the tax imposed under 18    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act for the 19    taxable year.20        (6) Liability for tax. Except as provided in this 21    paragraph, a partnership or Subchapter S making the 22    election under paragraph (1) is liable for the 23    entity-level tax imposed under paragraph (2). If the 24    electing partnership or corporation fails to pay the full 25    amount of tax deemed assessed under paragraph (2), the 26    partners or shareholders shall be liable to pay the tax   HB2609- 45 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    assessed (including penalties and interest). Each partner 2    or shareholder shall be liable for the unpaid assessment 3    based on the ratio of the partner's or shareholder's share 4    of the net income of the partnership over the total net 5    income of the partnership. If the partnership or 6    Subchapter S corporation fails to pay the tax assessed 7    (including penalties and interest) and thereafter an 8    amount of such tax is paid by the partners or 9    shareholders, such amount shall not be collected from the 10    partnership or corporation. 11        (7) Foreign tax. For purposes of the credit allowed 12    under Section 601(b)(3) of this Act, tax paid by a 13    partnership or Subchapter S corporation to another state 14    which, as determined by the Department, is substantially 15    similar to the tax imposed under this subsection, shall be 16    considered tax paid by the partner or shareholder to the 17    extent that the partner's or shareholder's share of the 18    income of the partnership or Subchapter S corporation 19    allocated and apportioned to such other state bears to the 20    total income of the partnership or Subchapter S 21    corporation allocated or apportioned to such other state. 22        (8) Suspension of withholding. The provisions of 23    Section 709.5 of this Act shall not apply to a partnership 24    or Subchapter S corporation for the taxable year for which 25    an election under paragraph (1) is in effect. 26        (9) Requirement to pay estimated tax. For each taxable   HB2609- 46 -LRB104 10355 HLH 20429 b1    year for which an election under paragraph (1) is in 2    effect, a partnership or Subchapter S corporation is 3    required to pay estimated tax for such taxable year under 4    Sections 803 and 804 of this Act if the amount payable as 5    estimated tax can reasonably be expected to exceed $500. 6        (10) The provisions of this subsection shall apply 7    only with respect to taxable years for which the 8    limitation on individual deductions applies under Section 9    164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. 10(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 11103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-396, eff. 1-1-24; 103-595, eff. 126-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.